Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-101.03
General interest rate; maximum; variable rate authorized; conditions.

(1) Except as provided in section 45-101.04, any rate of interest which may be agreed upon, not exceeding sixteen percent per annum on the unpaid principal balance, shall be valid upon any loan or forbearance of money, goods, or things in action and may be taken yearly, for any shorter period, or in advance, if so expressly agreed.

(2) Such rate of interest so long as it does not violate sections 45-101.02 to 45-113 or any federal usury law may be charged on a variable rate basis, except that if the lender proposes to increase the interest rate during the term of a loan on consumer goods notice of such proposed increase shall be communicated in writing to the person or persons primarily obligated on such loan at least ten days prior to the proposed increase. Deposit of such notice in the United States mails, postage prepaid, shall be deemed communication for the purpose of this section.

Laws 1975, LB 349, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 390, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 276, § 6;

Laws 1982, LB 778, § 1.

Notwithstanding limitations on interest rates imposed on state banks by Nebraska law, national bank in Nebraska can charge, with respect to credit card transactions, rates allowed by Nebraska law for "small loan companies". Fisher v. First Nat. Bank of Omaha, 548 F.2d 255 (8th Cir. 1977).